Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5115.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 21510a. (1) An owner or operator A claimant is
responsible for a deductible amount as follows:
(a) If the owner or operator or its affiliate owns or operates
RMH H04887'25 (H-2) 8fdrw4


fewer than 8 refined petroleum underground storage tanks, For a
first approved claim at the facility, $2,000.00. per claim.
(b) If the owner or operator or its affiliate owns or operates
8 or more refined petroleum underground storage tanks, For a second
approved claim at the facility, $10,000.00. per claim.
(c) The deductible amount under subdivisions (a) and (b) is
retroactive to all claims filed for releases discovered and
reported on or after December 30, 2014.For a third or subsequent
approved claim at the facility, $20,000.00.
(2) The deductible amount applies to each claim. However, 2 or
more claims arising out of the same, interrelated, associated,
repeated, or continuous releases or a series of related releases
shall be considered a single claim and are subject to 1 deductible
amount. Any claim that takes place over 2 or more claim periods is
subject to 1 deductible amount.
(2) (3) An owner or operator A claimant that submits a work
invoice under section 21515 is responsible for the deductible
amount described in subsection (1). The expenses toward meeting the
deductible amount shall must be documented and shall comply with
the following:
(a) Expenses for items listed in the schedule of costs shall
must be at or below the allowable reimbursement amount listed in
the schedule of costs.
(b) Expenses for items that are not listed in the schedule of
costs shall must be reasonable and necessary considering conditions
at the site based upon on a competitive bidding process established
by the authority or as otherwise determined necessary by the
authority.
Sec. 21510d. If an owner or operator intends to rely on the
RMH H04887'25 (H-2) 8fdrw4


fund to meet financial responsibility requirements, the owner or
operator shall submit to the authority a request for a
determination that the owner or operator would be eligible for
funding under this part in the event of a release from a refined
petroleum underground storage tank system. Upon On receipt of a
request under this subsection, the authority shall make a
determination and provide written notice of that determination , in
writing, to the owner or operator. The notice may contain
conditions for maintenance of that eligibility. A determination
under this section is based upon on a demonstration of all of the
following:
(a) The owner or operator is not ineligible for funding under
section 21510(4) and (5).21510.
(b) The refined petroleum underground storage tank or tanks
are presently in compliance with the registration and fee
requirements of part 211. A refined petroleum underground storage
tank owned by a federally recognized tribe is under federal
jurisdiction and is presently in compliance with federal financial
responsibility requirements.
(c) The owner or operator is not the United States government.
(d) The owner or operator has financial responsibility for the
deductible amount. In order to demonstrate that the owner or
operator has financial responsibility for the deductible amount
under this section and section 21510(1)(f), the owner or operator
may rely upon any on a financial assurance mechanism listed in 40
CFR 280.95 to 280.107 or either of the following:
(i) A financial test of self-insurance. To pass the financial
test of self-insurance, the owner or operator must submit, on a
form developed by the authority, financial information certified as
RMH H04887'25 (H-2) 8fdrw4


accurate by the chief financial officer, or an individual in a
comparable position, that demonstrates a tangible net worth of at
least 3 times the deductible amount required under this part.
(ii) A deposit account in the amount of the deductible amount
required under this part in a financial institution, as that term
is defined in section 1202 of the banking code of 1999, 1999 PA
276, MCL 487.11202, if access to the deposit account is restricted
by a deposit account control agreement or similar restriction as
approved by the authority that requires the approval of the
administrator for a withdrawal from the deposit account.
Sec. 21515. (1) To receive money from the authority for
corrective action, an owner or operator a claimant that has
received receives notice from the administrator that its claim has
been approved pursuant to in accordance with section 21510(8) 21510
shall follow the procedures outlined in this section and shall
submit work invoices to the administrator containing that contain
the information required by the administrator relevant to
determining compliance with this part.
(2) Within 45 60 days of after receipt of work invoices
submitted pursuant to in accordance with subsection (1) using forms
created by the authority, the administrator shall make all of the
following determinations:
(a) Whether the owner or operator claimant is eligible to
receive funding under this part.
(b) Whether the work performed or proposed to be performed is
consistent with part 213, and whether those activities are
consistent with achieving site closure.
(c) Whether the owner or operator claimant has paid the
deductible amount.
RMH H04887'25 (H-2) 8fdrw4


(d) Whether the corrective action performed is reasonable and
necessary considering conditions at the site of the release.
(e) Whether the cost of performing the corrective action work
is at or below the allowable reimbursement amount in the schedule
of costs. or, if If the corrective action work is not a an item
listed item, whether the cost is in the schedule of costs, the
corrective action work must be reasonable and necessary , and
whether the cost was considering conditions at the site, based upon
on a competitive bidding process established by the authority, or
otherwise determined to be reasonable and necessary by the
authority.
(3) The administrator may consult with the department and the
department of licensing and regulatory affairs to make the
determination required in subsection (2).
(4) If the administrator determines under subsection (2) that
the work invoice is reasonable and necessary considering conditions
at the site of the release and reasonable in terms of cost and the
owner or operator claimant is eligible for funding under this part,
the administrator shall approve the work invoice and notify the
owner or operator claimant that submitted the work invoice of the
approval. If the administrator determines that the work described
on the work invoices submitted was not reasonable and necessary or
the cost of the work is not reasonable, or that the owner or
operator claimant is not eligible for funding under this part, the
administrator shall deny the work invoice or any portion of the
work invoice submitted and give notice of the denial to the owner
or operator claimant that submitted the work invoice.
(5) The owner or operator claimant may submit work invoices to
the administrator that are related to a claim only after initial
RMH H04887'25 (H-2) 8fdrw4


approval of the claim under section 21510(8) 21510 and if the
aggregate amount of work invoices in the submission is $5,000.00 or
more, or 120 days or more have passed since the most recent work
invoice was submitted. This limitation does not apply to the final
work invoice submission related to the approved claim. A work
invoice must be submitted within 365 days after the completion of
the services for which reimbursement is being requested and must
not be submitted within 14 days after the most recent work invoice
was submitted.
(6) If the administrator determines that a work invoice does
not meet the requirements of subsection (2) or (5), the
administrator shall deny reimbursement for the work invoice and
give written notice of the denial to the owner or operator who
claimant that submitted the work invoice.
(7) The administrator shall approve a reimbursement for a work
invoice that was submitted by an owner or operator a claimant for
corrective action taken if the work invoice meets the requirements
of this part for an approved claim and an approved work invoice.
(8) Except as provided in subsection (9) and section 21519,
the authority shall make a joint payment to the owner or operator
claimant and the contractor that performed the work listed in the
approved work invoices within 45 days after the date of the
administrator's approval under subsection (4) if sufficient money
exists in the fund. Once payment has been made under this section,
the authority is not liable for any claim on the basis of that
payment.
(9) The authority may withhold partial payment of money on
payment vouchers if there is reasonable cause to suspect that there
are violations of section 21548 or if necessary to assure ensure
RMH H04887'25 (H-2) 8fdrw4


acceptable completion of the proposed work.
(10) The authority shall prepare and make available to owners
and operators a claimant standardized claim and work invoice forms.
(11) The authority shall not approve reimbursement for costs
related to any of the following:
(a) Costs arising from corrective actions that are not related
to the release for which the claim was approved.
(b) Punitive, exemplary, or multiplied damages, fines, taxes,
penalties, assessments, punitive or statutory assessments, or any
civil, administrative, or criminal fines, sanctions, or penalties.
(c) Legal or civil claims made by a claimant against another
owner or operator of the refined petroleum underground storage tank
system.
(d) Costs, charges, or expenses incurred by the claimant for
goods supplied by the claimant or services performed by the staff
or employees of the claimant, or its parent, subsidiary, or
affiliate, unless the costs, charges, or expenses are incurred with
the prior written approval of the authority.
(e) Costs arising from the testing, repair, reconstruction, or
upgrading of a refined petroleum underground storage tank system,
or any other improvements and site enhancements or routine
maintenance on, within, or under a location.
(f) Costs arising from a closure in place or from removing,
replacing, or recycling a refined petroleum underground storage
tank system, including removal and disposal of tank contents,
removal and replacement of pavement over the underground storage
tank system footprint, or backfilling and compacting void space
left by the removal of an underground storage tank system.
(g) Costs incurred more than 1 calendar day before the
RMH H04887'25 (H-2) 8fdrw4


reporting of the confirmed release for which a claim is approved.
(h) Costs related to the injury of an employee of the claimant
or its affiliate arising from and in the course of employment or
while performing duties related to the conduct of the business of
the claimant or its affiliate by a spouse, child, parent, brother,
or sister of that employee. This subdivision applies whether the
claimant may be liable as an employer or in any other capacity and
to any obligation to share damages with or repay someone else that
must pay damages because of the injury.
(i) Any obligation of the claimant under worker's
compensation, unemployment compensation, or disability benefits law
or a similar law.
(j) Any liability or claim for liability of others assumed by
the claimant under a contract or agreement, unless the claimant
would have been liable in the absence of the contract or agreement.
(k) Costs that have been or will be submitted to or that have
been paid in accordance with a third-party agreement or an
insurance policy.
(l) Costs arising from corrective actions that are not
necessary to obtain a restricted closure based on the land use at
the time and location the release was discovered. A restricted
closure can be achieved utilizing 1 or more institutional controls,
including, but not limited to, restrictive covenants, an
environmental license agreement with the department of
transportation, public highway as an alternative mechanism, or an
ordinance or state law or rule. Reimbursement of corrective actions
conducted in place of an institutional control may be considered
eligible if any of the following conditions are met and approved in
writing by the administrator before the corrective actions take
RMH H04887'25 (H-2) 8fdrw4


place:
(i) The corrective action will eliminate the need for
installation and long-term operation, maintenance, and monitoring
of mitigation measures that would otherwise be necessary to prevent
unacceptable exposures.
(ii) The corrective action will result in closure of the
release in a more expeditious manner and will provide a higher
level of confidence that closure of the release will remain
protective.
(iii) The corrective action is necessary to achieve closure of
off-site impact to properties that are not owned, operated, or
controlled by the claimant or the claimant's affiliate that is
liable under part 213.
(m) Costs incurred after the closure date of the release for
which the claim was filed, except for costs for monitoring well
abandonment, remediation system decommissioning, or related to
requirements recorded in an approved restrictive covenant or
institutional control, performed within 1 year after the closure
date. The administrator may grant an exception to the costs or time
limit described in this subdivision.
(n) Litigation costs.
(o) Any form of interest, late payment penalties, or carrying
charges.
(p) Shipping or postage charges related to the delivery of
soil, liquid, or vapor samples.
(q) Shipping charges for equipment listed on the schedule of
costs, unless the total for the equipment and shipping charges is
less than the schedule of costs equipment rate.
(r) Administrative costs, such as bookkeeping or form
RMH H04887'25 (H-2) 8fdrw4


preparation, including, but not limited to, eligibility requests,
claims, invoices, proposals, and change orders, and purchase orders
between claimant and consultant or claimant and contractor.
(s) Environmental liability insurance premiums.
(t) Replacement or repair of pavement, landscaping, fences,
utilities, or structures; property upgrades; or raze and rebuild
activities, unless directly associated with eligible and necessary
corrective actions.
(u) Costs incurred due to lost income, property loss, or
reduced property values unless part of an indemnification request
approved under section 21518.
(v) Fines or penalties imposed by local, state, or federal
government agencies.
(w) Punitive or exemplary damages.
(x) Costs related to the excavation, transport, and disposal
of more than 1,500 tons of soil without prior written authorization
from the administrator.
(y) Laboratory rates for rapid turnaround sample analysis that
exceed the maximum allowable rates on the schedule of costs, unless
preapproved by the administrator.
(z) Charges for equipment not used on the date of the charge.
(aa) Costs incurred if a non-low bidder performs required
competitively bid services, unless preapproved by the
administrator.
(bb) Corrective action activities, labor, laboratory testing,
drilling, or other work that exceeds actual costs as demonstrated
by submitted invoices.
(cc) Potentially refundable costs to the claimant, including,
but not limited to, permit inspection fees and cash bonds, until
RMH H04887'25 (H-2) 8fdrw4


the cost is actually incurred.
(dd) Consultant markup of items listed on the schedule of
costs, not including subcontractor invoices and schedule-of-cost
items included on a subcontractor invoice.
Sec. 21516. (1) An owner or operator A claimant with a claim
approved pursuant to in accordance with section 21510 for which
corrective action is in progress who that sells or transfers to
another person the property that is the subject of the approved
claim to another person may assign or transfer the approved claim
to that the other person. The person to whom the assignment or
transfer is made is eligible to receive money from the authority.
as an owner or operator for the release which is the subject of the
approved claim. Allowable, outstanding approved or paid work
invoices of the owner or operator making claimant that makes the
assignment or transfer may be counted toward the deductible amount
of the person to whom the assignment or transfer is made. The
person to whom the assignment or transfer is made has a claim limit
equal to the balance of the claim limit initially assigned to the
claimant that made the assignment or transfer, and the claim period
aggregate limit includes only reimbursements made to the person to
whom the assignment or transfer is made.
(2) An owner or operator assigning or transferring an approved
claim pursuant to this section shall notify the administrator of
the proposed assignment or transfer at least 10 days before the
effective date of the assignment or transfer.A claim that has
reached its claim limit or the original claim period aggregate
limit may not be transferred under this section.
Sec. 21518. (1) To receive money from the authority for
indemnification, the owner or operator claimant shall submit to the
RMH H04887'25 (H-2) 8fdrw4


administrator a request for indemnification containing that
contains the information required by the administrator, including a
all of the following:
(a) A copy of the judgment obtained by a third party from a
court of law against the owner or operator claimant or the
settlement entered into between the owner or operator claimant and
the third party, all as applicable.
(b) All documentation supporting that supports the
reasonableness of and justification for the judgment or settlement.
, and work
(c) Work invoices which conform to the requirements of this
part.
(2) If the administrator determines that the owner or operator
claimant is eligible for funding under this part, is eligible for
the amount requested, has paid the deductible amount, and has not
exceeded the allowable amount of expenditure provided in section
21510(1)(i), the claim limit or the claim period aggregate limit,
and that the work invoices are payable under this part, the
administrator shall forward a copy of the request for
indemnification along with all supporting documentation to the
attorney general. The attorney general shall approve the request
for indemnification if there is a legally enforceable judgment
against, or settlement with, the owner or operator claimant that
was caused by an accidental release and that is reasonable and
consistent with the purposes of this part. The attorney general may
raise as a defense to the request any rights or defenses that were
or are available to the owner or operator claimant and, in the case
of a judgment, that were not heard and ruled upon on by the court.
If a request for indemnification is approved by the attorney
RMH H04887'25 (H-2) 8fdrw4


general, the authority shall pay the indemnification amount.
(3) (2) The administrator shall keep records of all approved
requests for indemnification.
(4) (3) The authority shall make a payment to an owner or
operator a claimant for an approved indemnification request within
30 days if sufficient money is available to make the payment.
Sec. 21519. (1) The authority shall make payments on claims
work invoices in the order in which they are received. However, if
there is insufficient money available to make payments on all
approved claims, the authority shall give notice to each owner
claimant that is eligible to submit a claim work invoice under this
part advising the owners claimant of the financial situation and
the authority shall prioritize payments based upon on the risks at
the site to the public health, safety, or welfare or the
environment. Payments on claims that are not funded shall must be
paid if revenues subsequently become available.
(2) The authority and the this state are not liable for the
reimbursement of work invoices or requests for indemnification if
revenues of the authority are insufficient to meet these claims.
Sec. 21519a. (1) The department shall establish and the
authority shall administer a legacy release program as provided in
this section to reimburse eligible persons for costs of corrective
actions for certain historic releases from refined petroleum
underground storage tank systems. An eligible person may be
reimbursed for corrective action costs incurred if the eligible
person demonstrates all of the following:
(a) The release from which the corrective action or
indemnification arose was discovered and reported prior to before
December 30, 2014.
RMH H04887'25 (H-2) 8fdrw4


(b) The release upon on which the request for reimbursement is
based has not been closed pursuant to in accordance with part 213
prior to before December 30, 2014.
(c) Any refined petroleum underground storage tank systems
that are operating at the location from which the release occurred
are currently in compliance with the registration requirements of
part 211.
(c) (d) The request for reimbursement does not include
reimbursement for money that was reimbursed from any other source,
including insurance policies.
(d) (e) A claim submitted to the legacy release program shall
must not be approved by the authority for any of the prohibitions
listed under section 21510c.21510(8).
(e) (f) The request for reimbursement is for corrective action
performed on or after December 30, 2014.
(2) An eligible person that seeks to be reimbursed under the
legacy release program established under this section shall submit
to the authority a request for reimbursement on a form provided by
the authority containing and provide the documentation required by
the authority.
(3) The authority shall approve a request for reimbursement
under this section only as follows:
(a) The amount approved for reimbursement shall be is 50% of
the aggregate indemnification and corrective action costs incurred,
but not more than 50% of the reasonable and necessary eligible
costs as determined by the administrator pursuant to in accordance
with section 21515(2) to (10).(11).
(b) The total amount approved for reimbursement shall does not
exceed a total of $50,000.00 for all releases from refined
RMH H04887'25 (H-2) 8fdrw4


petroleum underground storage tank systems at a single location.
(c) An owner or operator may request a review of a denied
claim or work invoice per in accordance with section 21521.
(4) To be considered for reimbursement, work invoices must be
submitted to the administrator within 180 days after the effective
date of the 2025 amendatory act that amended this subsection.
(5) (4) As used in this section, "eligible person" means the
owner or operator of a refined petroleum underground storage tank
system at the time of the reporting of the release.
Sec. 21521. (1) If the administrator denies a claim, work
invoice, request for indemnification, or request for an eligibility
determination, under section 21510(8), the owner or operator, who
or claimant, that submitted the claim, work invoice, request for
indemnification, or request for an eligibility determination under
section 21510(8) may, within 14 business days following the denial,
request review by the board. However, if the administrator believes
the dispute may be able to be resolved without the board's review,
the administrator may contact the owner or operator, or claimant,
regarding the issues in dispute and may negotiate a resolution of
the dispute prior to before the board's review. The board shall
conduct a review of the denial to determine whether the claim, work
invoice, or request for indemnification is payable under this part.
(2) A person who that is denied approval by the board after
review under subsection (1) may appeal the decision directly to the
circuit court.
Sec. 21524. (1) The authority shall be governed by a board of
directors consisting of the director of the department and 6
residents of the this state, appointed by the governor with the
advice and consent of the senate, as follows:
RMH H04887'25 (H-2) 8fdrw4


(a) An individual representing petroleum refiners.
(b) An individual representing independent petroleum
marketers.
(c) An individual from a statewide motor fuel retail
association.
(d) An individual from a statewide business association that
includes owners or operators of refined petroleum underground
storage tanks.representing qualified underground storage tank
consultants with considerable experience in the remediation of
leaking refined petroleum underground storage tank systems.
(e) An individual from a statewide environmental organization.
(f) A member of the general public.
(2) The 6 appointed members of the board of directors shall
serve terms of 3 years. However, in making the initial
appointments, the governor shall designate 2 appointed members to
serve for 3 years, 2 appointed members to serve for 2 years, and 2
appointed members to serve for 1 year.
(3) Upon On appointment to the board of directors under
subsection (1), and upon on the taking and filing of the
constitutional oath of office, a member of the board of directors
shall enter office and exercise the duties of the office to which
he or she the member is appointed.
(4) A vacancy on the board of directors shall must be filled
in the same manner as the original appointment. A vacancy shall
must be filled for the balance of the unexpired term. A member of
the board of directors shall hold office until a successor is
appointed and qualified.
(5) Members of the board of directors and officers and
employees of the authority are subject to 1968 PA 317, MCL 15.321
RMH H04887'25 (H-2) 8fdrw4


to 15.330, and 1968 PA 318, MCL 15.301 to 15.310, as applicable. A
member of the board of directors or an officer, employee, or agent
of the authority shall discharge the duties of his or her the
position in a nonpartisan manner, with good faith, and with the
degree of diligence, care, and skill that an ordinarily prudent
person would exercise under similar circumstances in a like
position. In discharging his or her duties, a member of the board
of directors or an officer, employee, or agent of the authority,
when acting in good faith, may rely upon on any of the following:
(a) The opinion of counsel for the authority.
(b) The report of an independent appraiser selected with
reasonable care by the board of directors.
(c) Financial statements of the authority represented to the
member of the board of directors, officer, employee, or agent to be
correct by the officer of authority having charge of its books or
account, or stated in a written report by the auditor general or a
certified public accountant or the firm of the accountant to fairly
reflect the financial condition of the authority.
(6) The board of directors shall organize and make its own
policies and procedures. The board of directors shall conduct all
business at public meetings held in compliance with the open
meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275. Public notice of
the time, date, and place of each meeting shall must be given in
the manner required by the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL
15.261 to 15.275. Four members of the board of directors constitute
a quorum for the transaction of business. An action of the board of
directors shall must be by a majority of the votes cast. The
director of the department may designate a representative from his
or her the department to serve as a voting member of the board of
RMH H04887'25 (H-2) 8fdrw4


directors for 1 or more meetings.
(7) The board of directors shall elect a chairperson from
among its members and may elect any other officers the board of
directors considers appropriate.
Sec. 21548. (1) A person who that makes or submits or causes
to be made or submitted either directly or indirectly any a
statement, report, affidavit, application, claim, bid, work
invoice, or other request for payment or indemnification under this
part knowing that knows that the statement, report, application,
claim, bid, work invoice, or other request for payment or
indemnification is false or misleading, is guilty of a felony
punishable by imprisonment for not more than 5 years or a fine of
not more than $50,000.00, or both. In addition to any a penalty
imposed under this subsection, a person convicted under this
subsection shall pay restitution to the authority for the amount
received in violation of this subsection.
(2) A person who that makes or submits or causes to be made or
submitted either directly or indirectly any a statement, report,
application, claim, bid, work invoice, or other request for payment
or indemnification under this part knowing that knows that the
statement, report, affidavit, application, claim, bid, work
invoice, or other request for payment or indemnification is false,
misleading, or fraudulent, or who that commits a fraudulent
practice, is subject to a civil fine of not more than $50,000.00 or
twice the amount submitted, whichever is greater. In addition to
any a civil fine imposed under this subsection, a person found
responsible under this subsection shall pay restitution to the
authority for the amount received in violation of this subsection.
The legislature intends that this subsection be given retroactive
RMH H04887'25 (H-2) 8fdrw4


application.
(3) As used in subsection (2), "fraudulent" or "fraudulent
practice" includes, but is not limited to, the following:
(a) Submitting a work invoice for the excavation, hauling,
disposal, or provision of soil, sand, or backfill for an amount
greater than the legal capacity of the carrying vehicle or greater
than was actually carried, excavated, disposed, or provided.
(b) Submitting paperwork for services or work provided that
was not in fact provided or that was not directly provided by the
individual indicated on the paperwork.
(c) Contaminating an otherwise clean resource or site with
contaminated soil or product from a contaminated resource or site.
(d) Returning any load of contaminated soil to its original
site for reasons other than remediation of the soil.
(e) Causing damage intentionally or as the result of gross
negligence to a refined petroleum underground storage tank system,
which damage results in a release at a site.
(f) Placing a refined petroleum underground storage tank
system at a contaminated site where no refined petroleum
underground storage tank system previously existed for purposes of
disguising the source of contamination or to obtain funding under
this part.
(g) Submitting a work invoice for the excavation of soil from
a site that was removed for reasons other than removal of the
refined petroleum underground storage tank system or remediation.
(h) Any intentional act or act of gross negligence that causes
or allows contamination to spread at a site.
(i) Registration of a nonexistent refined petroleum
underground storage tank system with the department.
RMH H04887'25 (H-2) 8fdrw4


(j) Loaning to an owner or operator a claimant the deductible
amount and then submitting or causing to be submitted inflated
claims or invoices designed to recoup the deductible amount.
(k) Confirming a release without simultaneously providing
notice to the owner or operator.
(l) Inflating bills or work invoices, or both, by adding
charges for work that was not performed.
(m) Submitting a false or misleading laboratory report.
(n) Submitting bills or work invoices, or both, for sampling,
testing, monitoring, or excavation that are not justified by the
site condition.
(o) Falsely characterizing the contents of a refined petroleum
underground storage tank system for purposes of obtaining funding
under this part.
(p) Submitting or causing to be submitted bills or work
invoices by or from a person who that did not directly provide the
service.
(q) Characterizing legal services as consulting services for
purposes of obtaining funding under this part.
(r) Misrepresenting or concealing the identity, credentials,
affiliation, or qualifications of principals or persons seeking,
either directly or indirectly, funding or approval for
participation under this part.
(s) Falsifying a signature on a claim application or a work
invoice.
(t) Failing to accurately disclose the actual amount and
carrier of unencumbered insurance coverage available for new
environmental impairment or professional liability claims.
(u) Any other act or omission of a false, fraudulent, or
RMH H04887'25 (H-2) 8fdrw4


misleading nature undertaken in order to obtain funding under this
part.
(4) The attorney general or county prosecutor may conduct an
investigation of an alleged violation of this section and bring an
action for a violation of this section.
(5) If the attorney general or county prosecutor has
reasonable cause to believe that a person has information or is in
possession, custody, or control of any document or records, however
stored or embodied, or tangible object which is relevant to an
investigation of a violation or attempted violation of this part or
a crime or attempted crime against the fund, the attorney general
or county prosecutor may, before bringing any action, make an ex
parte request to a magistrate for issuance of a subpoena requiring
that person to appear and be examined under oath or to produce the
document, records, or object for inspection and copying, or both.
Service may be accomplished by any means described in the Michigan
court rules. Requests made by the attorney general may be brought
in Ingham county.
(6) If a person objects to or otherwise fails to comply with a
subpoena served under subsection (5), an action may be brought in
district court to enforce the demand. Actions filed by the attorney
general may be brought in Ingham county.
(7) The attorney general or county prosecutor may apply to the
district court for an order granting immunity to any person who
that refuses to provide or objects to providing information,
documents, records, or objects sought pursuant to under this
section. If the judge is satisfied that it is in the interest of
justice that immunity be granted, he or she the judge shall enter
an order granting immunity to the person and requiring the person
RMH H04887'25 (H-2) 8fdrw4


to appear and be examined under oath or to produce the document,
records, or object for inspection and copying, or both.
(8) A person who that fails to comply with a subpoena issued
pursuant to under subsection (5) or a requirement to appear and be
examined pursuant to under subsection (7) is subject to a civil
fine of not more than $25,000.00 for each day of continued
noncompliance.
(9) In addition to any civil fines or criminal penalties
imposed under this part or the criminal laws of this state, the
person found responsible shall repay any money obtained directly or
indirectly under this part. Money owed pursuant to under this
section constitutes a claim and lien by the authority upon any real
or personal property owned either directly or indirectly by the
person. This lien shall attach attaches regardless of whether the
person is insolvent and may not be extinguished or avoided by
bankruptcy. The lien imposed by this section has the force and
effect of a first in time and right judgment lien.
(10) Subsection (1) does not preclude prosecutions under other
laws of the this state including, but not limited to, section 157a,
218, 248, 249, 280, or 422 of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328,
MCL 750.157a, 750.218, 750.248, 750.249, 750.280, and 750.422.
(11) All civil fines collected pursuant to under this section
shall must be apportioned in the following manner:
(a) Fifty percent shall must be deposited in the general fund
and shall be used by the department to fund fraud investigations
under this part.
(b) Twenty-five percent shall must be paid to the office of
the county prosecutor or attorney general, whichever office brought
the action.
RMH H04887'25 (H-2) 8fdrw4


(c) Twenty-five percent shall must be paid to a local police
department or sheriff's office, or a city or county health
department, if investigation by that office or department led to
the bringing of the action. If more than 1 office or department is
eligible for payment under this subsection, division of payment
shall must be on an equal basis. If there is not a local office or
department that is entitled to payment under this subdivision, the
money shall must be forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit
into the refined petroleum fund.
Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect
unless House Bill No. 4940 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into
law.
Final Page
RMH H04887'25 (H-2) 8fdrw4